Washington statutes.
RCW 44.80.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Director" means the director of the office of legislative support services employed under RCW 44.80.040.

(2) "Legislative agencies" means: The joint legislative audit and review committee, the joint transportation committee, the office of the state actuary, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office of legislative support services, the *joint legislative systems committee, and the statute law committee.

(3) "Office" means the office of legislative support services.

[ 2012 c 113 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 44.68.020, creating the joint legislative systems committee, was repealed by 2020 c 114 s 1.

Effective date—2012 c 113: See note following RCW 44.80.010.